sv: Typ av styrpumpsremskiva: Kuggad/tandad; Remskiva ej tillämplig (ingen remskiva); Multiribbad; Kilrem; Övrigt
fr: Type de poulie de la pompe de direction: Cranté/denté; Poulie non applicable (sans poulie); À courroie serpentine; À courroie trapézoïdale; Autre
pl: Typ koła pasowego pompy układu kierowniczego: Zębate; Nie dotyczy (bez koła pasowego); Wielorowkowe; Klinowe; Inne
en: Steering pump pulley type: Cogged/toothed; Pulley not applicable (no pulley); Serpentine; V-belt; Other
zh-TW: 轉向幫浦皮帶輪類型: 齒形; 不適用皮帶輪 (無皮帶輪); 蛇形; V 型皮帶; 其他
ko: 스티어링 펌프 풀리 유형: 코그/톱니형; 풀리 해당 없음(풀리 없음); 서펜타인; V-벨트; 기타
fi: Ohjauspumpun hihnapyörän tyyppi: Hammastettu; Ei hihnapyörää; Moniura; Kiilahihna; Muu
ja: ステアリングポンププーリータイプ: コグ / 歯付き; プーリー非該当 (プーリーなし); サーペンタイン; Vベルト; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de polia da bomba de direção: Dentada; Polia não aplicável (sem polia); Serpentina; Correia em V; Outro
zh-CN: 转向泵皮带轮类型: 齿形带轮; 不适用带轮（无带轮）; 蛇形带轮; V 形带轮; 其他
nb: Type remskive på servostyringspumpe: Tannet; Remskive ikke aktuelt (uten remskive); Serpentin; Kilerem; Annet
th: แบบพูลเลย์ปั๊มพวงมาลัย: แบบมีฟัน/ร่อง; ไม่ใช้พูลเลย์ (ไม่มีพูลเลย์); แบบเซอร์เพนไทน์; สายพานร่องวี; อื่นๆ
vi: Loại puly bơm trợ lực lái: Có răng/rãnh; Không áp dụng puly (không có puly); Dây curoa gân; Dây curoa chữ V; Khác
da: Remskivetype for servostyringspumpe: Tandet/med tænder; Remskive ikke relevant (ingen remskive); Multirem; Kilerem; Andet
pt-BR: Bomba de direção polia tipo: Dentada; Polia não aplicável (sem polia); Serpentina; Correia em V; Outro
ru: Тип шкива рулевого насоса: Зубчатый шкив; Неприменимо (без шкива); Поликлиновой шкив; Клиновой шкив; Другое
cs: Typ řemenice čerpadla u řízení: Ozubený; Řemenice se nepoužívá (bez řemenice); Drážkovaný; Klínový řemen; Jiné
ro-RO: Tip de fulie pentru pompa de servodirecție: Dințată/Crenelată; Fulie neaplicabilă (fără fulie); Serpentină; Curea trapezoidală; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta jermenice krmilne črpalke: Zobati; Jermenica ni smiselna (brez jermenice); Klinasti (serpentine); Klinasti jermen (V-jermen); Drugo
hr-HR: Vrsta remenice crpke upravljača: Zupčasti/ozubljeni; Remenica nije primjenjiva (bez remenice); Kanalni (serpentine); Klinasti remen; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип шайба на помпата на сервоуправлението: Назъбена ролка; Ролката не е приложима (няма ролка); Пистова; Трапецовиден ремък; Друго
hu: Kormányrendszer-szivattyú szíjtárcsa típusa: Fogazott; Ékszíjtárcsa nem alkalmazható (nincs tárcsa); Hosszbordás (szerpentin); Ékszíj; Egyéb
de: Riemenscheibentyp der Lenkpumpe: Gezahnt; Riemenscheibe nicht anwendbar (keine Riemenscheibe); Keilrippenriemen; Keilriemen; Sonstige
tr: Direksiyon pompası kasnağı tipi: Tırtıklı/dişli; Kasnak uygulanamaz (kasnak yok); Serpantin; V kayışı; Diğer
nl: Stuurbekrachtigingspomp poelietype: Getand; Poelie niet van toepassing (geen poelie); Serpentine; V-snaar; Overige
lt-LT: Vairo siurblio skriemulio tipas: Dantytasis; Skriemulys netaikomas (be skriemulio); Daugiagriovelis; Trapecinio diržo; Kita
el: Τύπος τροχαλίας αντλίας διεύθυνσης: Οδοντωτή; Δεν ισχύει (χωρίς τροχαλία); Serpentine (poly-V); V-belt (Τραπεζοειδής); Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ remenice čerpadla riadenia: Ozubené; Remenica sa neuplatňuje (bez remenice); Drážkované; Klinový remeň; Iné
it: Tipo di puleggia della pompa dello sterzo: Dentata; Puleggia non applicabile (senza puleggia); Serpentina; Cinghia trapezoidale; Altro
es: Tipo de polea de la bomba de dirección: Dentado; Polea no aplicable (sin polea); Serpentina; Correa en V; Otro